src/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
LEXICON Num-tuhat_01
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-GEN  ; ! tuhannen
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe SG-GEN  ; ! tuhannehen
:%>%^WCnst SG-PAR_tA   ; ! tuhatt
:%>%^WCnsnte   SG-ILL_V   ; ! tuhantee
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe   SG-ILL_V   ; ! tuhantee
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-INE   ; ! tuhannees
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe SG-INE   ; ! tuhannehes
:%>%^WCnsnte		   SG-ELA   ; ! yhest
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe   SG-ELA   ; ! yhest
:%>%^WCnsnte               SG-ALL   ; ! tuhannelle
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe               SG-ALL   ; ! tuhannehelle
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-ADE   ; ! tuhanneel
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe SG-ADE   ; ! tuhannehel
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-ABL   ; ! maolt
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe SG-ABL   ; ! maolt
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-TRA   ; ! maoks
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe SG-TRA   ; ! maoks
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! tuhantenna
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsntehe SG-ESS_Vn   ; ! tuhantehheen
:%>%^WCnsnte    	 SG-EXE   ; ! mattoont
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsntehe SG-EXE   ; ! mattoont
+Sg+Instr:%>%^WCnsnte%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:%>%^WCnsnte PL-NOM   ; ! tuhannet
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-GEN  ; ! tuhansiin
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-GEN  ; ! tuhannehhiin
:%>%^WCnsns 		   PL-PAR_A  ; ! tuhansia
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-PAR_A  ; ! tuhannehhia
:%>%^WCnsns 		   PL-ILL_V  ; ! tuhansii
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ILL_V  ; ! tuhannehhii
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-INE  ; ! tuhansis
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-INE  ; ! tuhannehis
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-ELA  ; ! tuhansist
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ELA  ; ! tuhannehist
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-ALL  ; ! tuhansille
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ALL  ; ! tuhannehille
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-ADE  ; ! tuhansil
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ADE  ; ! tuhannehil
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-ABL  ; ! tuhansilt
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ABL  ; ! tuhannehilt
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-TRA  ; ! tuhansiks
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-TRA  ; ! tuhannehiks
+Dial/Lauk:%>%^WCnsns                PL-ESS_nnA  ; ! tuhansinna
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ESS_Vn  ; ! tuhannehhiin
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-EXE  ; ! tuhansint
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-EXE  ; ! tuhannehint
+Dial/Lauk:%>%^WCnsns      PL-COM  ; ! tuhansiinka



! from 3 onward
LEXICON NumOrd
:%>%^WCnss     SG-NOM   ; ! kolmas
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-GEN  ; ! kolmannen
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe SG-GEN  ; ! kolmannehen
:%>%^WCnst SG-PAR_tA   ; ! kolmatt
:%>%^WCnsnte   SG-ILL_V   ; ! kolmantee
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe   SG-ILL_V   ; ! kolmantee
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-INE   ; ! kolmannees
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe SG-INE   ; ! kolmannehes
:%>%^WCnsnte		   SG-ELA   ; ! yhest
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe   SG-ELA   ; ! yhest
:%>%^WCnsnte               SG-ALL   ; ! kolmannelle
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe               SG-ALL   ; ! kolmannehelle
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-ADE   ; ! kolmanneel
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe SG-ADE   ; ! kolmannehel
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-ABL   ; ! maolt
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe SG-ABL   ; ! maolt
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-TRA   ; ! maoks
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnnehe SG-TRA   ; ! maoks
:%>%^WCnsnte SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! kolmantenna
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsntehe SG-ESS_Vn   ; ! kolmantehheen
:%>%^WCnsnte    	 SG-EXE   ; ! mattoont
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsntehe SG-EXE   ; ! mattoont
+Sg+Instr:%>%^WCnsnte%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:%>%^WCnsnte PL-NOM   ; ! kolmannet
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-GEN  ; ! kolmansiin
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-GEN  ; ! kolmannehhiin
:%>%^WCnsns 		   PL-PAR_A  ; ! kolmansia
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-PAR_A  ; ! kolmannehhia
:%>%^WCnsns 		   PL-ILL_V  ; ! kolmansii
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ILL_V  ; ! kolmannehhii
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-INE  ; ! kolmansis
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-INE  ; ! kolmannehis
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-ELA  ; ! kolmansist
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ELA  ; ! kolmannehist
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-ALL  ; ! kolmansille
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ALL  ; ! kolmannehille
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-ADE  ; ! kolmansil
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ADE  ; ! kolmannehil
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-ABL  ; ! kolmansilt
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ABL  ; ! kolmannehilt
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-TRA  ; ! kolmansiks
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-TRA  ; ! kolmannehiks
+Dial/Lauk:%>%^WCnsns                PL-ESS_nnA  ; ! kolmansinna
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-ESS_Vn  ; ! kolmannehhiin
:%>%^WCnsns                PL-EXE  ; ! kolmansint
+Dial/Soik:%>%^WCnsnneh    PL-EXE  ; ! kolmannehint
+Dial/Lauk:%>%^WCnsns      PL-COM  ; ! kolmansiinka



! joka
LEXICON QntUniv-attr
+Qnt+Univ+Attr: # ;

! Numerals


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
